Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 4. Forms.

Secs. 47.33.400,
47.33.410.
License required; Licensing agency. [Repealed, § 49 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 47.33.420.
Standard forms.

The Department of Health and Social Services shall develop standard forms that assisted living homes may use to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 130 SLA 1994; am E.O. No. 108 § 19 (2003))

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, deleted reference to the Department of Administration.

Sec. 47.33.430.
Authority of state agencies to impose additional requirements. [Repealed, § 49 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Secs. 47.33.500 — 47.33.570.
Complaint; Immunity; Investigation; Notice of violation; Report of compliance; Administrative sanctions; Administrative procedures; Criminal penalty. [Repealed, § 49 ch 57 SLA 2005.]